lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 13357 Y 2
SFX 13357 uiti uiti/548 . 349
SFX 13357 uitis uitis/548 . 349

SFX 13358 Y 2
SFX 13358 uiti uiti/549 . 349
SFX 13358 uitis uitis/549 . 349

SFX 13359 Y 2
SFX 13359 uiti uiti/550 . 349
SFX 13359 uitis uitis/550 . 349

SFX 13360 Y 2
SFX 13360 uiti uiti/551 . 349
SFX 13360 uitis uitis/551 . 349

SFX 13361 Y 2
SFX 13361 uiti uiti/552 . 349
SFX 13361 uitis uitis/552 . 349

SFX 13362 Y 2
SFX 13362 uiti uiti/553 . 349
SFX 13362 uitis uitis/553 . 349

SFX 13373 Y 2
SFX 13373 uiti ūja/554 . 350
SFX 13373 uitis ūjasi/554 . 350

SFX 13374 Y 2
SFX 13374 uiti ūja/555 . 350
SFX 13374 uitis ūjasi/555 . 350

SFX 13375 Y 2
SFX 13375 uiti ūja/556 . 350
SFX 13375 uitis ūjasi/556 . 350

SFX 13376 Y 2
SFX 13376 uiti ūja/557 . 350
SFX 13376 uitis ūjasi/557 . 350

SFX 13377 Y 2
SFX 13377 uiti ūja/558 . 350
SFX 13377 uitis ūjasi/558 . 350

SFX 13378 Y 2
SFX 13378 uiti ūja/559 . 350
SFX 13378 uitis ūjasi/559 . 350

SFX 13379 Y 2
SFX 13379 uiti ūja/560 . 350
SFX 13379 uitis ūjasi/560 . 350

SFX 13380 Y 2
SFX 13380 uiti ūja/561 . 350
SFX 13380 uitis ūjasi/561 . 350

SFX 13381 Y 2
SFX 13381 uiti ūja/562 . 350
SFX 13381 uitis ūjasi/562 . 350

SFX 13391 Y 1
SFX 13391 uiti ūjie/563 . 350

SFX 13392 Y 1
SFX 13392 uitis ūjie/564 . 350

SFX 13393 Y 2
SFX 13393 uiti ujo/565 . 351
SFX 13393 uitis ujosi/565 . 351

SFX 13394 Y 2
SFX 13394 uiti ujo/566 . 351
SFX 13394 uitis ujosi/566 . 351

SFX 13395 Y 2
SFX 13395 uiti ujo/567 . 351
SFX 13395 uitis ujosi/567 . 351

SFX 13399 Y 2
SFX 13399 ulti ulti/544 . 349
SFX 13399 ultis ultis/544 . 349

SFX 13400 Y 2
SFX 13400 ulti ulti/545 . 349
SFX 13400 ultis ultis/545 . 349

SFX 13401 Y 2
SFX 13401 ulti ulti/546 . 349
SFX 13401 ultis ultis/546 . 349

SFX 13402 Y 2
SFX 13402 ulti ulti/547 . 349
SFX 13402 ultis ultis/547 . 349

SFX 13403 Y 2
SFX 13403 ulti ulti/548 . 349
SFX 13403 ultis ultis/548 . 349

SFX 13404 Y 2
SFX 13404 ulti ulti/549 . 349
SFX 13404 ultis ultis/549 . 349

SFX 13405 Y 2
SFX 13405 ulti ulti/550 . 349
SFX 13405 ultis ultis/550 . 349

SFX 13406 Y 2
SFX 13406 ulti ulti/551 . 349
SFX 13406 ultis ultis/551 . 349

SFX 13407 Y 2
SFX 13407 ulti ulti/552 . 349
SFX 13407 ultis ultis/552 . 349

SFX 13408 Y 2
SFX 13408 ulti ulti/553 . 349
SFX 13408 ultis ultis/553 . 349

SFX 13419 Y 2
SFX 13419 ulti ūla/554 . 350
SFX 13419 ultis ūlasi/554 . 350

SFX 13420 Y 2
SFX 13420 ulti ūla/555 . 350
SFX 13420 ultis ūlasi/555 . 350

SFX 13421 Y 2
SFX 13421 ulti ūla/556 . 350
SFX 13421 ultis ūlasi/556 . 350

SFX 13422 Y 2
SFX 13422 ulti ūla/557 . 350
SFX 13422 ultis ūlasi/557 . 350

SFX 13423 Y 2
SFX 13423 ulti ūla/558 . 350
SFX 13423 ultis ūlasi/558 . 350

SFX 13424 Y 2
SFX 13424 ulti ūla/559 . 350
SFX 13424 ultis ūlasi/559 . 350

SFX 13425 Y 2
SFX 13425 ulti ūla/560 . 350
SFX 13425 ultis ūlasi/560 . 350

SFX 13426 Y 2
SFX 13426 ulti ūla/561 . 350
SFX 13426 ultis ūlasi/561 . 350

SFX 13427 Y 2
SFX 13427 ulti ūla/562 . 350
SFX 13427 ultis ūlasi/562 . 350

SFX 13437 Y 1
SFX 13437 ulti ūlie/563 . 350

SFX 13438 Y 1
SFX 13438 ultis ūlie/564 . 350

SFX 13439 Y 2
SFX 13439 ulti ulo/565 . 351
SFX 13439 ultis ulosi/565 . 351

SFX 13440 Y 2
SFX 13440 ulti ulo/566 . 351
SFX 13440 ultis ulosi/566 . 351

SFX 13441 Y 2
SFX 13441 ulti ulo/567 . 351
SFX 13441 ultis ulosi/567 . 351

SFX 13445 Y 2
SFX 13445 ūti ūti/544 . 349
SFX 13445 ūtis ūtis/544 . 349

SFX 13446 Y 2
SFX 13446 ūti ūti/574 . 349
SFX 13446 ūtis ūtis/574 . 349

SFX 13447 Y 2
SFX 13447 ūti ūti/546 . 349
SFX 13447 ūtis ūtis/546 . 349

SFX 13448 Y 2
SFX 13448 ūti ūti/547 . 349
SFX 13448 ūtis ūtis/547 . 349

SFX 13449 Y 2
SFX 13449 ūti ūti/548 . 349
SFX 13449 ūtis ūtis/548 . 349

SFX 13450 Y 2
SFX 13450 ūti ūti/549 . 349
SFX 13450 ūtis ūtis/549 . 349

SFX 13451 Y 2
SFX 13451 ūti ūti/550 . 349
SFX 13451 ūtis ūtis/550 . 349

SFX 13452 Y 2
SFX 13452 ūti ūti/551 . 349
SFX 13452 ūtis ūtis/551 . 349

SFX 13453 Y 2
SFX 13453 ūti ūti/552 . 349
SFX 13453 ūtis ūtis/552 . 349

SFX 13454 Y 2
SFX 13454 ūti ūti/553 . 349
SFX 13454 ūtis ūtis/553 . 349

SFX 13465 Y 6
SFX 13465 ūti ūva/554 . 350
SFX 13465 ūtis ūvasi/554 . 350
SFX 13465 ūti ūsta/554 . 350
SFX 13465 ūtis ūstasi/554 . 350
SFX 13465 ūti ūna/554 . 350
SFX 13465 ūtis ūnasi/554 . 350

SFX 13466 Y 6
SFX 13466 ūti ūva/555 . 350
SFX 13466 ūtis ūvasi/555 . 350
SFX 13466 ūti ūsta/555 . 350
SFX 13466 ūtis ūstasi/555 . 350
SFX 13466 ūti ūna/555 . 350
SFX 13466 ūtis ūnasi/555 . 350

SFX 13467 Y 6
SFX 13467 ūti ūva/556 . 350
SFX 13467 ūtis ūvasi/556 . 350
SFX 13467 ūti ūsta/556 . 350
SFX 13467 ūtis ūstasi/556 . 350
SFX 13467 ūti ūna/556 . 350
SFX 13467 ūtis ūnasi/556 . 350

SFX 13468 Y 6
SFX 13468 ūti ūva/557 . 350
SFX 13468 ūtis ūvasi/557 . 350
SFX 13468 ūti ūsta/557 . 350
SFX 13468 ūtis ūstasi/557 . 350
SFX 13468 ūti ūna/557 . 350
SFX 13468 ūtis ūnasi/557 . 350

SFX 13469 Y 6
SFX 13469 ūti ūva/558 . 350
SFX 13469 ūtis ūvasi/558 . 350
SFX 13469 ūti ūsta/558 . 350
SFX 13469 ūtis ūstasi/558 . 350
SFX 13469 ūti ūna/558 . 350
SFX 13469 ūtis ūnasi/558 . 350

SFX 13470 Y 6
SFX 13470 ūti ūva/559 . 350
SFX 13470 ūtis ūvasi/559 . 350
SFX 13470 ūti ūsta/559 . 350
SFX 13470 ūtis ūstasi/559 . 350
SFX 13470 ūti ūna/559 . 350
SFX 13470 ūtis ūnasi/559 . 350

SFX 13471 Y 6
SFX 13471 ūti ūva/560 . 350
SFX 13471 ūtis ūvasi/560 . 350
SFX 13471 ūti ūsta/560 . 350
SFX 13471 ūtis ūstasi/560 . 350
SFX 13471 ūti ūna/560 . 350
SFX 13471 ūtis ūnasi/560 . 350

SFX 13472 Y 6
SFX 13472 ūti ūva/561 . 350
SFX 13472 ūtis ūvasi/561 . 350
SFX 13472 ūti ūsta/561 . 350
SFX 13472 ūtis ūstasi/561 . 350
SFX 13472 ūti ūna/561 . 350
SFX 13472 ūtis ūnasi/561 . 350

SFX 13473 Y 6
SFX 13473 ūti ūva/562 . 350
SFX 13473 ūtis ūvasi/562 . 350
SFX 13473 ūti ūsta/562 . 350
SFX 13473 ūtis ūstasi/562 . 350
SFX 13473 ūti ūna/562 . 350
SFX 13473 ūtis ūnasi/562 . 350

SFX 13483 Y 3
SFX 13483 ūti ūvie/563 . 350
SFX 13483 ūti ūstie/563 . 350
SFX 13483 ūti ūnie/563 . 350

SFX 13484 Y 3
SFX 13484 ūtis ūvie/564 . 350
SFX 13484 ūtis ūstie/564 . 350
SFX 13484 ūtis ūnie/564 . 350

SFX 13525 Y 2
SFX 13525 ūti uvo/565 . 351
SFX 13525 ūtis uvosi/565 . 351

SFX 13526 Y 2
SFX 13526 ūti uvo/566 . 351
SFX 13526 ūtis uvosi/566 . 351

SFX 13527 Y 2
SFX 13527 ūti uvo/567 . 351
SFX 13527 ūtis uvosi/567 . 351

SFX 13531 Y 2
SFX 13531 amti amti/544 . 349
SFX 13531 amtis amtis/544 . 349

SFX 13532 Y 2
SFX 13532 amti amti/545 . 349
SFX 13532 amtis amtis/545 . 349

SFX 13533 Y 2
SFX 13533 amti amti/546 . 349
SFX 13533 amtis amtis/546 . 349

SFX 13534 Y 2
SFX 13534 amti amti/547 . 349
SFX 13534 amtis amtis/547 . 349

SFX 13535 Y 2
SFX 13535 amti amti/548 . 349
SFX 13535 amtis amtis/548 . 349

SFX 13536 Y 2
SFX 13536 amti amti/549 . 349
SFX 13536 amtis amtis/549 . 349

SFX 13537 Y 2
SFX 13537 amti amti/550 . 349
SFX 13537 amtis amtis/550 . 349

SFX 13538 Y 2
SFX 13538 amti amti/551 . 349
SFX 13538 amtis amtis/551 . 349

SFX 13539 Y 2
SFX 13539 amti amti/552 . 349
SFX 13539 amtis amtis/552 . 349

SFX 13540 Y 2
SFX 13540 amti amti/553 . 349
SFX 13540 amtis amtis/553 . 349

SFX 13551 Y 2
SFX 13551 amti ąma/554 . 350
SFX 13551 amtis ąmasi/554 . 350

SFX 13552 Y 2
SFX 13552 amti ąma/555 . 350
SFX 13552 amtis ąmasi/555 . 350

SFX 13553 Y 2
SFX 13553 amti ąma/556 . 350
SFX 13553 amtis ąmasi/556 . 350

SFX 13554 Y 2
SFX 13554 amti ąma/557 . 350
SFX 13554 amtis ąmasi/557 . 350

SFX 13555 Y 2
SFX 13555 amti ąma/558 . 350
SFX 13555 amtis ąmasi/558 . 350

SFX 13556 Y 2
SFX 13556 amti ąma/559 . 350
SFX 13556 amtis ąmasi/559 . 350

SFX 13557 Y 2
SFX 13557 amti ąma/560 . 350
SFX 13557 amtis ąmasi/560 . 350

SFX 13558 Y 2
SFX 13558 amti ąma/561 . 350
SFX 13558 amtis ąmasi/561 . 350

SFX 13559 Y 2
SFX 13559 amti ąma/562 . 350
SFX 13559 amtis ąmasi/562 . 350

SFX 13569 Y 1
SFX 13569 amti ąmie/563 . 350

SFX 13570 Y 1
SFX 13570 amtis ąmie/564 . 350

SFX 13571 Y 2
SFX 13571 amti amo/565 . 351
SFX 13571 amtis amosi/565 . 351

SFX 13572 Y 2
SFX 13572 amti amo/566 . 351
SFX 13572 amtis amosi/566 . 351

SFX 13573 Y 2
SFX 13573 amti amo/567 . 351
SFX 13573 amtis amosi/567 . 351

SFX 13577 Y 2
SFX 13577 arti arti/544 . 349
SFX 13577 artis artis/544 . 349

AF 13353,13354,13373,13393,65521 # 134
AF 13577,13578,13597,13637,65521 # 205
AF 13445,13446,13465,13525,65521 # 286
AF 13445,13446,13465,13483,13484,13525,65521 # 530
