lt_LT.dic
apduiti/134	12
apskarti/205	12
atkarti/205	12
bežūti/286	12
neapduiti/134	34
nebepražūti/286	34
nebežūti/286	34
nenukarti/205	34
nepražūti/286	34
nežūti/286	34
nukarti/205	12
nuskarti/205	12
pražūti/286	12
tebeapduiti/134	12
tebežūti/286	12
tepražūti/286	12
težūti/286	12
žūti/530	12
